Louisiana, session 2026, HB303.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3995(A)(1)(b)(v) is enacted to read as follows:
§3995. Charter school funding
A.(1) For the purpose of funding, a Type 1, Type 3, Type 3B not acting as
its own local education agency, and Type 4 charter school shall be considered an
approved public school of the local school board entering into the charter agreement.
Type 2 charter schools and a Type 3B charter school acting as its own local
education agency shall receive a per pupil amount each year authorized by the state
board each year as provided in the approved minimum foundation program formula.
The per pupil amount provided to a Type 1, 2, 3, 3B, or 4 charter school shall be
computed annually and shall be equal to the per pupil amount provided through the
minimum foundation program formula, determined by the allocation weights in the
formula based upon student characteristics or needs, received by the school district
in which the student resides from the following sources based on the district's
membership count used in the minimum foundation program formula:
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-989 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 303
(b)
* * *
(v) For the purposes of this Subparagraph, local revenues of a school board
also shall exclude any amount granted by the state for the cost of providing
transportation to nonpublic school students as provided in R.S. 17:158.
* * *